src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Note: Spanish numerals are used for higher numbers,
! except for certain nums

LEXICON num
+Num: # ;


LEXICON Numeral

peteĩ num ; !  eins

mokõi num ; !  zwei

mbohapy num ; !  drei

irundy num ; !  vier

po num ; !  fünf
poteĩ num ; !  6
pokõi num ; !  7
pohapy num ; !  8
porundy num ; !  9
